Illinois, session 104th, SB1884.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Personnel Code is amended by changing 5Section 8b and adding Section 8b.21 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 415/8b)  (from Ch. 127, par. 63b108b)7    Sec. 8b. Jurisdiction B; merit B - Merit and fitness. 8    (a) For positions in the State service subject to the 9jurisdiction of the Department of Central Management Services 10with respect to selection and tenure on the basis of merit and 11fitness, those matters specified in this Section and Sections 128b.1 through 8b.21 8b.17.13    (b) Application, testing and hiring procedures for all 14State employment vacancies for positions not exempt under 15Section 4c shall be reduced to writing and made available to 16the public via the Department's website or equivalent. All 17vacant positions subject to Jurisdiction B shall be posted. 18Vacant positions shall be posted on the Department's website 19in such a way that potential job candidates can easily 20identify and apply for job openings and identify the county in 21which the vacancy is located. Vacant positions shall be 22updated at least weekly.23    (c) If a position experiences a vacancy rate that is   SB1884 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07524 BDA 17568 b1greater than or equal to 10%, that position shall be posted 2until the vacancy rate is less than 10%. 3(Source: P.A. 103-108, eff. 6-27-23.) 4    (20 ILCS 415/8b.21 new)5    Sec. 8b.21. Degree requirements. The Department of Central 6Management Services may consider relevant work experience if 7the Department determines that it is equivalent to a college 8degree when appropriate. This Section does not apply to job 9titles or positions that require a license, certificate, or 10registration under any State law, federal law, State 11administrative rule, or federal administrative regulation. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.